Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 49. AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM

Sec. 49.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Agricultural crisis" means an event or condition, including adverse weather conditions, water shortages, disruption in transportation, low commodity prices, an animal health issue, crop disease, or insect infestation, that could disrupt or jeopardize an aspect of the agricultural industry.

(2) "Agri-tech program" means the agricultural technology program established under this chapter.

(3) "Applied research" means research directed at gaining the knowledge or understanding necessary to meet a specific and recognized need, including the discovery of new scientific knowledge that has specific objectives relating to products or processes.

(4) "Eligible institution" means an institution of higher education, as that term is defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, that is designated as an eligible institution under Section 49.002(e).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1459, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(2), 21.002(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 49.002. ADMINISTRATION; GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES. (a) The department shall develop, maintain, and administer the agri-tech program to provide support for eligible institutions to conduct research projects on methods to address agricultural crises in this state.

(b) In awarding funds to support projects under this chapter, the department shall:

(1) give priority to applied research projects that the commissioner determines to be necessary to address an immediate agricultural crisis; and

(2) consider the recommendations of the Commodity Crisis Council for specific projects.

(c) The department shall award funds to support projects as needed to address agricultural crises in this state.

(d) The department shall develop and maintain guidelines and procedures to provide awards under this chapter for specific projects at eligible institutions on a competitive, peer-review basis.

(e) The department shall determine whether an institution of higher education qualifies as an eligible institution for the purposes of this chapter. To be designated as an eligible institution, an institution of higher education must demonstrate an exceptional capability to attract federal, state, and private funding for scientific and technical research and have an exceptionally strong research staff and the necessary equipment and facilities.

(f) In considering projects for selection, the commissioner shall give special consideration to projects that:

(1) leverage funds from other sources; and

(2) propose innovative, collaborative efforts:

(A) across academic disciplines;

(B) involving two or more eligible institutions; or

(C) involving eligible institutions, private industry, and the federal government.

(g) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1459, Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 49.003. AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY ACCOUNT. (a) The agricultural technology account is an account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The agricultural technology account consists of legislative appropriations, gifts and grants received under Subsection (c), and other money required by law to be deposited in the account.

(c) The department may solicit and accept gifts in kind and grants of money from the federal government, local governments, private corporations, or other persons to be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Funds in the agricultural technology account may be used only as provided by this chapter. The account is exempt from the application of Section 403.095, Government Code.

(e) Income from money in the account shall be credited to the account.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1459, Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 49.004. USE OF FUNDS IN AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY ACCOUNT. (a) From funds appropriated for the agri-tech program, the comptroller shall issue warrants to each eligible institution in the amount certified by the department to the comptroller.

(b) Funds awarded from the agricultural technology account may be expended to support the particular research project for which the award is made and may not be expended for the general support of research and instruction at the institution conducting or sponsoring the project or for the construction or remodeling of a facility.

(c) Funds in the agricultural technology account shall be used, when practicable within the purposes of this chapter, to match grants provided by the federal government or private industry for specific collaborative research projects at eligible institutions.

(d) Supplies, materials, services, and equipment purchased with funds obtained under this section are not subject to the purchasing authority of the comptroller.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1459, Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.004 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.81, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 49.005. PROGRESS REPORTS. An institution receiving funds under this chapter shall report on the progress of the funded research to the department not later than September 1 of each year.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1459, Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.